Nevada, session 83, AB421.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In addition to any other immunity from civil liability
provided by law, volunteer security personnel of a religious
organization who are providing safety, security or protection
services for a religious organization are immune from civil
liability for injury or damage caused by their acts or omissions if:
(a) Such volunteer security personnel are acting within the
scope of their duties and responsibilities as volunteer security
personnel; and
(b) Such acts or omissions are not reckless, wanton or grossly
negligent.
2. In addition to any other immunity from civil liability
provided by law, a religious organization is immune from civil
liability for the acts or omissions of its volunteer security
personnel who are providing safety, security or protection services
on its behalf pursuant to subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Religious organization” means an organization for which
the primary purpose is the operation of a church, synagogue,
mosque, temple or other place of religious worship at which
religious services and activities are regularly conducted.
(b) “Volunteer security personnel” means persons who provide
safety, security or protection services for a religious organization:
(1) Without compensation, other than reimbursement for
actual and necessary expenses on behalf of or to benefit the
religious organization; and
(2) To protect persons who are attending a service, meeting,
class or other gathering held at, or sponsored by, the religious
organization or to secure and protect its property.
-
*AB421*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 41.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.480 1. Except as otherwise provided [in NRS 41.519,] by
specific statute, a nonprofit corporation, association or organization
formed under the laws of this State is not immune from liability for
the injury or damage caused any person, firm or corporation as a
result of the negligent or wrongful act of the nonprofit corporation,
association or organization, or its agents, employees or servants
acting within the scope of their agency or employment.
2. No action may be brought against an officer, trustee, director
or other possessor of the corporate powers of a nonprofit association
or trust formed under the laws of this State based on any act or
omission arising from failure in his or her official capacity to
exercise due care regarding the management or operation of the
entity unless the act or omission involves intentional misconduct,
fraud or a knowing violation of the law.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a civil
action that is filed on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB421*